New York, session 2025-2026, A9352.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1321 of the real property actions and proceedings 2 law is amended by adding a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. Where a referee is directed to compute the amount due under this 4 section, the referee shall: 5 (a) reflect all sums owing under the note and mortgage as of the date 6 of the proposed judgment amount, except as otherwise ordered by the 7 court for good cause shown. 8 (b) itemize the computation in a form prescribed by the chief adminis- 9 trative judge, including, but not limited to, any: 10 (i) unpaid principal balance; 11 (ii) accrued interest with applicable rates and date ranges; 12 (iii) advances for taxes, insurance, and property preservation; 13 (iv) contractual fees and charges; and 14 (v) court-approved costs and disbursements. 15 (c) only include items supported by documentation submitted by the 16 foreclosing plaintiff that would be admissible as evidence; provided, 17 however, where there is an absence of adequate documentation for an 18 item, the referee shall refer the issue to the court. 19 § 2. The real property actions and proceedings law is amended by 20 adding a new section 1351-a to read as follows: 21 § 1351-a. Valuation date standard for sale and deficiency calcu- 22 lations. For all foreclosure sales under this article, the amount due 23 on the debt, and any subsequent calculation for deficiency or surplus 24 distribution pursuant to sections thirteen hundred sixty-one or thirteen EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14164-02-5 A. 9352 2 1 hundred seventy-one of this article, shall be computed using the valu- 2 ation date of the date the property is bid on at public auction; 3 provided, however, where the court expressly orders a different valu- 4 ation date upon application of any party for good cause shown, such date 5 shall be used as the valuation date. 6 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 7 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 8 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 9 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 10 on or before such effective date.